Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Senior Games

209.500.
Kentucky Senior Games Program.

The Kentucky Senior Games Program is hereby created within the Department for Aging and Independent Living of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The program shall develop a year-round recreation, fitness, and health promotion program for Kentuckians fifty-five (55) years of age or older which shall provide a network of local competition and participation that culminates in a senior games state final.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 427, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 242, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 27, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 297, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 17, effective June 26, 2007.